New York, session 2025-2026, A8262.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 214 of the county law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Exemption. The provisions herein requiring the designation of a 4 newspaper for official notices for local laws, notices and other matters 5 required by law to be published as required in subdivision two of this 6 section shall not apply where a county does not have a newspaper 7 published within the county. Such county shall be authorized to publish 8 local laws and notices through an official county website or other 9 state-run digital platform. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11363-01-5